apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="lé/as__n">
  <e><p><l>as-s</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as-s</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as-s</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as-sa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as-sa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as-sa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>as</l>        <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa-s</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa-s</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa-s</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa</l>       <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa</l>       <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asa</l>       <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asacha</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asachasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asachasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asachasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna-s</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asanna</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asannasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asannasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asannasa</l>  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asasa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asasa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asasa</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>is-s</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>is-se</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>is</l>        <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ise-s</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ise</l>       <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>isese</l>     <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="léaspá/in__n">
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="léirscr/ios__n">
  <e><p><l>easta-s</l>   <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>easta</l>     <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eastasa</l>   <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ios-s</l>     <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ios-sa</l>    <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ios</l>       <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="líonol/ann__n">
  <e><p><l>ann-s</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ann-s</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ann</l>       <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ann</l>       <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anna-s</l>    <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anna</l>      <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>annasa</l>    <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>annsa</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>annsa</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>la-s</l>      <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>la</l>        <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lasa</l>      <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ac__n">
  <e><p><l>ac-s</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ac-s</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ac</l>        <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ac</l>        <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>acsa</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>acsa</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ic-s</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ic-s</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ic</l>        <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ic</l>        <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>icse</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>icse</l>      <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="léas"><i>lé</i><par n="lé/as__n"/></e>
<e lm="léaspáin"><i>léaspá</i><par n="léaspá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="léirscrios"><i>léirscr</i><par n="léirscr/ios__n"/></e>
<e lm="líonolann"><i>líonol</i><par n="líonol/ann__n"/></e>
<e lm="mac"><i>m</i><par n="m/ac__n"/></e>
<e lm="olann"><i>ol</i><par n="líonol/ann__n"/></e>
<e lm="scrios"><i>scr</i><par n="léirscr/ios__n"/></e>
